Tennessee, session 114, HB1056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-320, is amended by deleting
subdivision (6) and substituting:
(6) Adventure Science Center;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1056
002886
- 1 -